Washington statutes.
RCW 10.96.060

Issuance of criminal process.

A judge of the superior court may issue any criminal process to any recipient at any address, within or without the state, for any matter over which the court has criminal jurisdiction pursuant to RCW 9A.04.030. This section does not limit a court's authority to issue warrants or legal process under other provisions of state law.

[ 2008 c 21 s 7.]